Illinois, session 104th, HB1896.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Electricity Excise Tax Law is amended by 5changing Sections 2-3, 2-4, and 2-7 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 640/2-3)7    Sec. 2-3. Definitions. As used in this Law, unless the 8context clearly requires otherwise:9    (a) "Department" means the Department of Revenue of the 10State of Illinois.11    (b) "Director" means the Director of the Department of 12Revenue of the State of Illinois.13    (c) "Person" means any natural individual, firm, trust, 14estate, partnership, association, joint stock company, joint 15venture, corporation, limited liability company, or a 16receiver, trustee, guardian, or other representative appointed 17by order of any court, or any city, town, village, county, or 18other political subdivision of this State.19    (d) "Purchase price" means the consideration paid for the 20distribution, supply, furnishing, sale, transmission or 21delivery of electricity to a person for non-residential use or 22consumption (and for both residential and non-residential use 23or consumption in the case of electricity purchased from a   HB1896- 2 -LRB104 07569 HLH 17613 b1municipal system or electric cooperative described in 2subsection (b) of Section 2-4) and not for resale, and for all 3services directly related to the production, transmission or 4distribution of electricity distributed, supplied, furnished, 5sold, transmitted or delivered for non-residential use or 6consumption, and includes transition charges imposed in 7accordance with Article XVI of the Public Utilities Act and 8instrument funding charges imposed in accordance with Article 9XVIII of the Public Utilities Act, as well as cash, services 10and property of every kind or nature, and shall be determined 11without any deduction on account of the cost of the service, 12product or commodity supplied, the cost of materials used, 13labor or service costs, or any other expense whatsoever. 14Beginning on July 1, 2025, "purchase price" includes the 15consideration paid by an operator of an electric vehicle 16charging station to its supplier for the electrical power 17transferred to the operator's customers for the purpose of 18charging or recharging the battery or other energy storage 19device of an electric vehicle. However, "purchase price" shall 20not include consideration paid for: 21        (i) any charge for a dishonored check; 22        (ii) any finance or credit charge, penalty or charge 23    for delayed payment, or discount for prompt payment; 24        (iii) any charge for reconnection of service or for 25    replacement or relocation of facilities; 26        (iv) any advance or contribution in aid of   HB1896- 3 -LRB104 07569 HLH 17613 b1    construction; 2        (v) repair, inspection or servicing of equipment 3    located on customer premises; 4        (vi) leasing or rental of equipment, the leasing or 5    rental of which is not necessary to furnishing, supplying 6    or selling electricity; 7        (vii) any purchase by a purchaser if the supplier is 8    prohibited by federal or State constitution, treaty, 9    convention, statute or court decision from recovering the 10    related tax liability from such purchaser; and 11        (viii) any amounts added to purchasers' bills because 12    of charges made pursuant to the tax imposed by this Law.13    In case credit is extended, the amount thereof shall be 14included only as and when payments are made.15    "Purchase price" shall not include consideration received 16from business enterprises certified under Section 9-222.1 or 179-222.1A of the Public Utilities Act, as amended, to the 18extent of such exemption and during the period of time 19specified by the Department of Commerce and Economic 20Opportunity. Beginning on July 1, 2025, "purchase price" shall 21not include the consideration paid to an operator of an 22electric vehicle charging station by a customer of the 23operator for the electrical power transferred to charge or 24recharge the battery or other energy storage device of an 25electric vehicle. 26    (e) "Purchaser" means any person who acquires electricity   HB1896- 4 -LRB104 07569 HLH 17613 b1for use or consumption and not for resale, for a valuable 2consideration. Beginning on July 1, 2025, "purchaser" also 3means an operator of an electric vehicle charging station that 4provides for free or sells for valuable consideration 5electricity to persons at electric vehicle charging stations 6to charge or recharge the battery or other energy storage 7device of an electric vehicle. 8    (f) "Non-residential electric use" means any use or 9consumption of electricity which is not residential electric 10use.11    (g) "Residential electric use" means electricity used or 12consumed at a dwelling of 2 or fewer units, or electricity for 13household purposes used or consumed at a building with 14multiple dwelling units where the electricity is registered by 15a separate meter for each dwelling unit.16    (h) "Self-assessing purchaser" means a purchaser for 17non-residential electric use who elects to register with and 18to pay tax directly to the Department in accordance with 19Sections 2-10 and 2-11 of this Law.20    (i) "Delivering supplier" means any person engaged in the 21business of delivering electricity to persons for use or 22consumption and not for resale, but not an entity engaged in 23the practice of resale and redistribution of electricity 24within a building prior to January 2, 1957, nor, beginning 25July 1, 2025, an operator of an electric vehicle charging 26station, and who, in any case where more than one person   HB1896- 5 -LRB104 07569 HLH 17613 b1participates in the delivery of electricity to a specific 2purchaser, is the last of the suppliers engaged in delivering 3the electricity prior to its receipt by the purchaser.4    (j) "Delivering supplier maintaining a place of business 5in this State", or any like term, means any delivering 6supplier having or maintaining within this State, directly or 7by a subsidiary, an office, generation facility, transmission 8facility, distribution facility, sales office or other place 9of business, or any employee, agent or other representative 10operating within this State under the authority of such 11delivering supplier or such delivering supplier's subsidiary, 12irrespective of whether such place of business or agent or 13other representative is located in this State permanently or 14temporarily, or whether such delivering supplier or such 15delivering supplier's subsidiary is licensed to do business in 16this State.17    (k) "Use" means the exercise by any person of any right or 18power over electricity incident to the ownership of that 19electricity, except that it does not include the generation, 20production, transmission, distribution, delivery or sale of 21electricity in the regular course of business or the use of 22electricity for such purposes.23    (l) "Electric vehicle" means a vehicle that is powered by 24and refueled by electricity from an external power source.25    (m) "Electric vehicle charging station" means a facility 26equipped with chargers and supporting equipment that is   HB1896- 6 -LRB104 07569 HLH 17613 b1available for the purpose of delivering electricity to charge 2or recharge the battery or other energy storage device of an 3electric vehicle.4    (n) "Operator" means a person that provides for free or 5sells for valuable consideration electricity at an electric 6vehicle charging station. 7(Source: P.A. 94-793, eff. 5-19-06.) 8    (35 ILCS 640/2-4)9    Sec. 2-4. Tax imposed. 10    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) and (g), a tax is 11imposed on the privilege of using in this State electricity 12purchased for use or consumption and not for resale, other 13than by municipal corporations owning and operating a local 14transportation system for public service, at the following 15rates per kilowatt-hour delivered to the purchaser:16        (i) For the first 2000 kilowatt-hours used or consumed 17    in a month: 0.330 cents per kilowatt-hour;18        (ii) For the next 48,000 kilowatt-hours used or 19    consumed in a month: 0.319 cents per kilowatt-hour;20        (iii) For the next 50,000 kilowatt-hours used or 21    consumed in a month: 0.303 cents per kilowatt-hour;22        (iv) For the next 400,000 kilowatt-hours used or 23    consumed in a month: 0.297 cents per kilowatt-hour;24        (v) For the next 500,000 kilowatt-hours used or 25    consumed in a month: 0.286 cents per kilowatt-hour;  HB1896- 7 -LRB104 07569 HLH 17613 b1        (vi) For the next 2,000,000 kilowatt-hours used or 2    consumed in a month: 0.270 cents per kilowatt-hour;3        (vii) For the next 2,000,000 kilowatt-hours used or 4    consumed in a month: 0.254 cents per kilowatt-hour;5        (viii) For the next 5,000,000 kilowatt-hours used or 6    consumed in a month: 0.233 cents per kilowatt-hour;7        (ix) For the next 10,000,000 kilowatt-hours used or 8    consumed in a month: 0.207 cents per kilowatt-hour;9        (x) For all electricity in excess of 20,000,000 10    kilowatt-hours used or consumed in a month: 0.202 cents 11    per kilowatt-hour.12    Provided, that in lieu of the foregoing rates, the tax is 13imposed on a self-assessing purchaser at the rate of 5.1% of 14the self-assessing purchaser's purchase price for all 15electricity distributed, supplied, furnished, sold, 16transmitted and delivered to the self-assessing purchaser in a 17month.18    (b) A tax is imposed on the privilege of using in this 19State electricity purchased from a municipal system or 20electric cooperative, as defined in Article XVII of the Public 21Utilities Act, which has not made an election as permitted by 22either Section 17-200 or Section 17-300 of such Act, at the 23lesser of 0.32 cents per kilowatt hour of all electricity 24distributed, supplied, furnished, sold, transmitted, and 25delivered by such municipal system or electric cooperative to 26the purchaser or 5% of each such purchaser's purchase price   HB1896- 8 -LRB104 07569 HLH 17613 b1for all electricity distributed, supplied, furnished, sold, 2transmitted, and delivered by such municipal system or 3electric cooperative to the purchaser, whichever is the lower 4rate as applied to each purchaser in each billing period.5    (c) The tax imposed by this Section 2-4 is not imposed with 6respect to any use of electricity by business enterprises 7certified under Section 9-222.1 or 9-222.1A of the Public 8Utilities Act, as amended, to the extent of such exemption and 9during the time specified by the Department of Commerce and 10Economic Opportunity; or with respect to any transaction in 11interstate commerce, or otherwise, to the extent to which such 12transaction may not, under the Constitution and statutes of 13the United States, be made the subject of taxation by this 14State.15    (d) The tax imposed by this Section 2-4 is not imposed with 16respect to any use of electricity at a REV Illinois Project 17site that has received a certification for tax exemption from 18the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity pursuant 19to Section 95 of the Reimagining Energy and Vehicles in 20Illinois Act, to the extent of such exemption, which shall be 21no more than 10 years. 22    (e) The tax imposed by this Section 2-4 is not imposed with 23respect to any use of electricity at a project site that has 24received a certification for tax exemption from the Department 25of Commerce and Economic Opportunity pursuant to the 26Manufacturing Illinois Chips for Real Opportunity (MICRO) Act,   HB1896- 9 -LRB104 07569 HLH 17613 b1to the extent of such exemption, which shall be no more than 10 2years. 3    (f) The tax imposed by this Section 2-4 is not imposed with 4respect to any use of electricity at a quantum computing 5campus that has received a certification for tax exemption 6from the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7pursuant to Section 605-1115 of the Department of Commerce and 8Economic Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 9Illinois to the extent of the exemption and during the period 10of time specified by the Department of Commerce and Economic 11Opportunity. 12    (g) Beginning July 1, 2025, a tax is imposed at the rates 13specified in subsection (a) of this Section on the operator of 14an electric vehicle charging station for the electric power 15transferred for the purpose of charging electric vehicles. The 16tax is not imposed on any person who purchases or acquires for 17free electricity at an electric vehicle charging station for 18the purpose of charging or recharging the battery or other 19energy storage device of an electric vehicle. 20(Source: P.A. 102-669, eff. 11-16-21; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 21102-1125, eff. 2-3-23; 103-595, eff. 6-26-24.) 22    (35 ILCS 640/2-7)23    Sec. 2-7. Collection of electricity excise tax. 24    (a) Beginning with bills for electricity or electric 25service issued on and after August 1, 1998, the tax imposed by   HB1896- 10 -LRB104 07569 HLH 17613 b1this Law shall be collected from the purchaser, other than a 2self-assessing purchaser where the delivering supplier or 3suppliers are notified by the Department that the purchaser 4has been registered as a self-assessing purchaser for the 5accounts listed by the self-assessing purchaser as described 6in Section 2-10 of this Law, by any delivering supplier 7maintaining a place of business in this State at the rates 8stated in Section 2-4 with respect to the electricity 9delivered by such delivering supplier to or for the purchaser, 10and shall be remitted to the Department as provided in Section 112-9 of this Law. All sales to a purchaser are presumed subject 12to tax collection unless the Department notifies the 13delivering supplier that the purchaser has been registered as 14a self-assessing purchaser for the accounts listed by the 15self-assessing purchaser as described in Section 2-10 of this 16Law. Upon receipt of notification by the Department, the 17delivering supplier is relieved of all liability for the 18collection and remittance of tax from the self-assessing 19purchaser for which notification was provided by the 20Department. The delivering supplier is relieved of the 21liability for the collection of the tax from a self-assessing 22purchaser until such time as the delivering supplier is 23notified in writing by the Department that the purchaser's 24certification as a self-assessing purchaser is no longer in 25effect. Delivering suppliers shall collect the tax from 26purchasers by adding the tax to the amount of the purchase   HB1896- 11 -LRB104 07569 HLH 17613 b1price received from the purchaser for delivering electricity 2for or to the purchaser. Where a delivering supplier does not 3collect the tax from a purchaser, other than a self-assessing 4purchaser, as provided herein, such purchaser shall pay the 5tax directly to the Department.6    (b) The credit allowed to a public utility under Section 78-403.1 of the Public Utilities Act shall be allowed as a 8credit against the public utility's obligation to remit 9electricity excise tax described in Section 2-9.10    (c) Beginning July 1, 2025, a delivering supplier shall 11collect the tax imposed by this Law from operators of electric 12vehicle charging stations unless the operator has obtained a 13certificate of registration as a self-assessing purchaser of 14electricity pursuant to Section 2-10 of this Law. An operator 15may not purchase electricity from a delivering supplier for 16resale without paying the tax imposed in Section 2-4 of this 17Law. 18(Source: P.A. 90-561, eff. 8-1-98; 90-624, eff. 7-10-98; 1990-813, eff. 1-29-99.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.